Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-402
Property, claims, or rights of deceased or ward; interested person establish; complaint; effect.

If a personal representative, heir, devisee, creditor, or other person interested in the estate of any deceased person or a conservator or guardian for a ward complains to the judge of the county court, upon an application under oath given on information and belief, that (1) any person may have concealed, embezzled, carried away, or disposed of any money or personal property of the deceased or the ward, (2) such person may have in his or her possession or knowledge any deeds, conveyances, bonds, contracts, or other writings, which contain evidence of or tend to disclose the right, title, interest, or claim of the deceased or the ward to any real or personal estate or any claim or demand, (3) such person may have in his or her possession any will of the deceased or any power of attorney, advance health care directive, or power of attorney for health care decisions executed by the ward, or (4) such person may have information or knowledge withheld by the respondent from the personal representative, conservator, or guardian and needed by the personal representative, conservator, or guardian for the recovery of any property by suit or otherwise, the judge may cite such person to appear before the court of probate. Any personal representative, heir, devisee, creditor, conservator, guardian, or other person interested in the estate of such deceased person or the ward may examine such person under oath upon the matter of such complaint or direct interrogatories to him or her. The citation may also direct the person cited to bring with him or her, for examination by the judge and parties interested, any such documents or writings, or any will of the deceased, which may be in his or her possession or under his or her control.

Laws 1978, LB 650, § 24;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 30-3002;

Laws 2015, LB43, § 4.